Massachusetts, session 194th, H3292.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 6 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out section 12V and 
inserting in place thereof the following section:– 
Section 12V. The governor shall annually issue a proclamation setting apart the second 
Monday in October as Indigenous Peoples Day and recommending that it be observed by the 
people, with appropriate exercises in the schools and otherwise, to acknowledge the history of 
genocide and discrimination against Indigenous peoples, to honor the histories and contributions 
of Indigenous peoples, and to recognize and celebrate the thriving cultures and continued 
resistance and resilience of Indigenous peoples and their tribal nations.